tables/en-ueb-g2.ctb
match %[_~^]%<* about (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12
match %[_~^]%<* above (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-1236
match %[_~^]%<* according (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-14
match %[_~^]%<* across (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-14-1235
match %[_~^]%<*%a* after (%2%a*)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124   appendix 1.4
match %[_~^]%<* afternoon (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1345
match %[_~^]%<* afterward (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2456
match %[_~^]%<* again (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-1245
match %[_~^]%<* against (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-1245-34
match %[_~^]%<* almost (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-123-134
match %[_~^]%<* already (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* also (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-123
match %[_~^]%<* although (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-123-1456
match %[_~^]%<* altogether (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-123-2345
match %[_~^]%<* always (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1-123-2456
match %[_~^]%<* because (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-14
match %[_~^]%<* before (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-124
match %[_~^]%<* behind (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-125
match %[_~^]%<* below (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-123
match %[_~^]%<* beneath (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-1345
match %[_~^]%<* beside (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-234
match %[_~^]%<* between (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-2345
match %[_~^]%<* beyond (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 23-13456
match %[_~^]%<*%a* blind (%2%a*)?%>*%[_~^] 12-123   appendix 1.4
match %[_~^]%<*%a* braille %a*(s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123   10.9.3
match %[_~^]%<*%a* children (%2%a*)?(s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 16-1345   10.9.3
match %[_~^]%<* conceive (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 25-14-1236
match %[_~^]%<* conceiving (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 25-14-1236-1245
match %[_~^]%<* could (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 14-145
match %[_~^]%<* deceive (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-1236
match %[_~^]%<* deceiving (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-1236-1245
match %[_~^]%<* declare (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-123
match %[_~^]%<* declaring (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-123-1245
match %[_~^]%<* either (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 15-24
match %[_~^]%<* first (%2%a*)?(s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 124-34   10.9.3
match %[_~^]%<*%a* friend (%2%a*)?%>*%[_~^] 124-1235   appendix 1.4
match %[_~^]%<* good (%2%a*)?(s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1245-145   10.9.3
match %[_~^]%<*%a* great %a*(s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1245-1235-2345   10.9.3
match %[_~^]%<* herself (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 125-12456-124
match %[_~^]%<* him (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 125-134
match %[_~^]%<* himself (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 125-134-124
match %[_~^]%<* immediate (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 24-134-134
match %[_~^]%<* its (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1346-234
match %[_~^]%<* itself (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1346-124
match %[_~^]%<* letter (%2%a*)?(s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 123-1235   10.9.3
match %[_~^]%<* little (%2%a*)?(s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 123-123   10.9.3
match %[_~^]%<* much (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 134-16
match %[_~^]%<* must (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 134-34
match %[_~^]%<* myself (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 134-13456-124
match %[_~^]%<* necessary (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1345-15-14
match %[_~^]%<* neither (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1345-15-24
match %[_~^]%<* oneself (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 5-135-124
match %[_~^]%<* ourselves (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1256-1235-1236-234
match %[_~^]%<* paid (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1234-145
match %[_~^]%<* perceive (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1234-12456-14-1236
match %[_~^]%<* perceiving (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1234-12456-14-1236-1245
match %[_~^]%<* perhaps (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1234-12456-125
match %[_~^]%<* quick (%2%a*)?(s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 12345-13   10.9.3
match %[_~^]%<* receive (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1235-14-1236
match %[_~^]%<* receiving (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1235-14-1236-1245
match %[_~^]%<* rejoice (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1235-245-14
match %[_~^]%<* rejoicing (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1235-245-14-1245
match %[_~^]%<* said (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 234-145
match %[_~^]%<* should (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 146-145
match %[_~^]%<* such (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 234-16
match %[_~^]%<* themselves (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2346-134-1236-234
match %[_~^]%<* thyself (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 1456-13456-124
match %[_~^]%<* today (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2345-145
match %[_~^]%<* together (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2345-1245-1235
match %[_~^]%<* tomorrow (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2345-134
match %[_~^]%<* tonight (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2345-1345
match %[_~^]%<* would (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 2456-145
match %[_~^]%<* your (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 13456-1235
match %[_~^]%<* yourself (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 13456-1235-124
match %[_~^]%<* yourselves (s|'s)?%>*%[_~^] 13456-1235-1236-234

backmatch %[_^] about %[_^] 1-12
backmatch %[_^] above %[_^] 1-12-1236
backmatch %[_^] according %[_^] 1-14
backmatch %[_^] across %[_^] 1-14-1235
backmatch %[_^] after %[_^] 1-124   appendix 1.4
backmatch %[_^] afternoon %[_^] 1-124-1345
backmatch %[_^] afterward %[_^] 1-124-2456
backmatch %[_^] again %[_^] 1-1245
backmatch %[_^] against %[_^] 1-1245-34
backmatch %[_^] almost %[_^] 1-123-134
backmatch %[_^] already %[_^] 1-123-1235
backmatch %[_^] also %[_^] 1-123
backmatch %[_^] although %[_^] 1-123-1456
backmatch %[_^] altogether %[_^] 1-123-2345
backmatch %[_^] always %[_^] 1-123-2456
backmatch %[_^] because %[_^] 23-14
backmatch %[_^] before %[_^] 23-124
backmatch %[_^] behind %[_^] 23-125
backmatch %[_^] below %[_^] 23-123
backmatch %[_^] beneath %[_^] 23-1345
backmatch %[_^] beside %[_^] 23-234
backmatch %[_^] between %[_^] 23-2345
backmatch %[_^] beyond %[_^] 23-13456
backmatch %[_^] blind %[_^] 12-123   appendix 1.4
backmatch %[_^] braille %[_^] 12-1235-123   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] children %[_^] 16-1345   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] conceive %[_^] 25-14-1236
backmatch %[_^] conceiving %[_^] 25-14-1236-1245
backmatch %[_^] could %[_^] 14-145
backmatch %[_^] deceive %[_^] 145-14-1236
backmatch %[_^] deceiving %[_^] 145-14-1236-1245
backmatch %[_^] declare %[_^] 145-14-123
backmatch %[_^] declaring %[_^] 145-14-123-1245
backmatch %[_^] either %[_^] 15-24
backmatch %[_^] first %[_^] 124-34   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] friend %[_^] 124-1235   appendix 1.4
backmatch %[_^] good %[_^] 1245-145   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] great %[_^] 1245-1235-2345   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] herself %[_^] 125-12456-124
backmatch %[_^] him %[_^] 125-134
backmatch %[_^] himself %[_^] 125-134-124
backmatch %[_^] immediate %[_^] 24-134-134
backmatch %[_^] its %[_^] 1346-234
backmatch %[_^] itself %[_^] 1346-124
backmatch %[_^] letter %[_^] 123-1235   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] little %[_^] 123-123   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] much %[_^] 134-16
backmatch %[_^] must %[_^] 134-34
backmatch %[_^] myself %[_^] 134-13456-124
backmatch %[_^] necessary %[_^] 1345-15-14
backmatch %[_^] neither %[_^] 1345-15-24
backmatch %[_^] oneself %[_^] 5-135-124
backmatch %[_^] ourselves %[_^] 1256-1235-1236-234
backmatch %[_^] paid %[_^] 1234-145
backmatch %[_^] perceive %[_^] 1234-12456-14-1236
backmatch %[_^] perceiving %[_^] 1234-12456-14-1236-1245
backmatch %[_^] perhaps %[_^] 1234-12456-125
backmatch %[_^] quick %[_^] 12345-13   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] receive %[_^] 1235-14-1236
backmatch %[_^] receiving %[_^] 1235-14-1236-1245
backmatch %[_^] rejoice %[_^] 1235-245-14
backmatch %[_^] rejoicing %[_^] 1235-245-14-1245
backmatch %[_^] said %[_^] 234-145
backmatch %[_^] should %[_^] 146-145
backmatch %[_^] such %[_^] 234-16
backmatch %[_^] themselves %[_^] 2346-134-1236-234
backmatch %[_^] thyself %[_^] 1456-13456-124
backmatch %[_^] today %[_^] 2345-145
backmatch %[_^] together %[_^] 2345-1245-1235
backmatch %[_^] tomorrow %[_^] 2345-134
backmatch %[_^] tonight %[_^] 2345-1345
backmatch %[_^] would %[_^] 2456-145
backmatch %[_^] your %[_^] 13456-1235
backmatch %[_^] yourself %[_^] 13456-1235-124
backmatch %[_^] yourselves %[_^] 13456-1235-1236-234

#TODO:  backmatch should be able to merge these
backmatch %[_^] abouts %[_^] 1-12-234
backmatch %[_^] aboves %[_^] 1-12-1236-234
backmatch %[_^] accordings %[_^] 1-14-234
backmatch %[_^] acrosss %[_^] 1-14-1235-234
backmatch %[_^] afters %[_^] 1-124-234   appendix 1.4
backmatch %[_^] afternoons %[_^] 1-124-1345-234
backmatch %[_^] afterwards %[_^] 1-124-2456-234
backmatch %[_^] agains %[_^] 1-1245-234
backmatch %[_^] againsts %[_^] 1-1245-34-234
#backmatch %[_^] almosts %[_^] 1-123-134-234
backmatch %[_^] alreadys %[_^] 1-123-1235-234
backmatch %[_^] alsos %[_^] 1-123-234
backmatch %[_^] althoughs %[_^] 1-123-1456-234
backmatch %[_^] altogethers %[_^] 1-123-2345-234
backmatch %[_^] alwayss %[_^] 1-123-2456-234
backmatch %[_^] becauses %[_^] 23-14-234
backmatch %[_^] befores %[_^] 23-124-234
backmatch %[_^] behinds %[_^] 23-125-234
backmatch %[_^] belows %[_^] 23-123-234
backmatch %[_^] beneaths %[_^] 23-1345-234
backmatch %[_^] besides %[_^] 23-234-234
backmatch %[_^] betweens %[_^] 23-2345-234
backmatch %[_^] beyonds %[_^] 23-13456-234
backmatch %[_^] blinds %[_^] 12-123-234   appendix 1.4
backmatch %[_^] brailles %[_^] 12-1235-123-234   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] childrens %[_^] 16-1345-234   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] conceives %[_^] 25-14-1236-234
backmatch %[_^] conceivings %[_^] 25-14-1236-1245-234
backmatch %[_^] coulds %[_^] 14-145-234
backmatch %[_^] deceives %[_^] 145-14-1236-234
backmatch %[_^] deceivings %[_^] 145-14-1236-1245-234
backmatch %[_^] declares %[_^] 145-14-123-234
backmatch %[_^] declarings %[_^] 145-14-123-1245-234
backmatch %[_^] eithers %[_^] 15-24-234
backmatch %[_^] firsts %[_^] 124-34-234   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] friends %[_^] 124-1235-234-234   appendix 1.4
backmatch %[_^] goods %[_^] 1245-145-234   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] greats %[_^] 1245-1235-2345-234   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] herselfs %[_^] 125-12456-124-234
backmatch %[_^] hims %[_^] 125-134-234
backmatch %[_^] himselfs %[_^] 125-134-124-234
backmatch %[_^] immediates %[_^] 24-134-134-234
backmatch %[_^] itss %[_^] 1346-234-234
backmatch %[_^] itselfs %[_^] 1346-124-234
backmatch %[_^] letters %[_^] 123-1235-234   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] littles %[_^] 123-123-234   10.9.3
backmatch %[_^] muchs %[_^] 134-16-234
backmatch %[_^] musts %[_^] 134-34-234
backmatch %[_^] myselfs %[_^] 134-13456-124-234
backmatch %[_^] necessarys %[_^] 1345-15-14-234
backmatch %[_^] neithers %[_^] 1345-15-24-234
backmatch %[_^] oneselfs %[_^] 5-135-124-234
backmatch %[_^] ourselvess %[_^] 1256-1235-1236-234-234
backmatch %[_^] paids %[_^] 1234-145-234
backmatch %[_^] perceives %[_^] 1234-12456-14-1236-234
backmatch %[_^] perceivings %[_^] 1234-12456-14-1236-1245-234
backmatch %[_^] perhapss %[_^] 1234-12456-125-234
backmatch %[_^] quicks %[_^] 12345-13   10.9.3-234
backmatch %[_^] receives %[_^] 1235-14-1236-234
backmatch %[_^] receivings %[_^] 1235-14-1236-1245-234
backmatch %[_^] rejoices %[_^] 1235-245-14-234
backmatch %[_^] rejoicings %[_^] 1235-245-14-1245-234
backmatch %[_^] saids %[_^] 234-145-234
backmatch %[_^] shoulds %[_^] 146-145-234
backmatch %[_^] suchs %[_^] 234-16-234
backmatch %[_^] themselvess %[_^] 2346-134-1236-234-234
backmatch %[_^] thyselfs %[_^] 1456-13456-124-234
backmatch %[_^] todays %[_^] 2345-145-234
backmatch %[_^] togethers %[_^] 2345-1245-1235-234
backmatch %[_^] tomorrows %[_^] 2345-134-234
backmatch %[_^] tonights %[_^] 2345-1345-234
backmatch %[_^] woulds %[_^] 2456-145-234
backmatch %[_^] yours %[_^] 13456-1235-234
backmatch %[_^] yourselfs %[_^] 13456-1235-124-234
backmatch %[_^] yourselvess %[_^] 13456-1235-1236-234-234
